South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S82.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 10-1-169.  The United States flag and the State flag shall be displayed at all polling locations in the State. No other flag shall be displayed in these locations. The Department of Administration shall purchase suitable flags for display at all polling locations and cause them to be displayed, the expense to be borne out of the funds appropriated to it. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----